Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.170

Supervision as condition—Levy of assessment. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

As a condition of granting deferred prosecution, the court may order supervision of the petitioner during the period of deferral and may levy a monthly assessment upon the petitioner as provided in RCW 10.64.120. In a jurisdiction with a probation department, the court may appoint the probation department to supervise the petitioner. In a jurisdiction without a probation department, the court may appoint an appropriate person or agency to supervise the petitioner. A supervisor appointed under this section shall be required to do at least the following:

(1) If the charge for which deferral is granted relates to operation of a motor vehicle, at least once every six months request from the department of licensing an abstract of the petitioner's driving record; and

(2) At least once every month make contact with the petitioner or with any agency to which the petitioner has been directed for treatment as a part of the deferral.

[ 1991 c 247 s 2; 1985 c 352 s 19.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.

PDFRCW 10.05.170

Supervision as condition—Levy of assessment. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

As a condition of granting deferred prosecution, the court may order supervision of the petitioner during the period of deferral and may levy a monthly assessment upon the petitioner as provided in RCW 10.64.120. In a jurisdiction with a probation department, the court may appoint the probation department to supervise the petitioner. In a jurisdiction without a probation department, the court may appoint an appropriate person or agency to supervise the petitioner. A supervisor appointed under this section shall be required to do at least the following:

(1) If the charge for which deferral is granted relates to operation of a motor vehicle, at least once every three months request an abstract of the petitioner's driving record;

(2) At least once every month make contact with the petitioner until treatment is completed;

(3) Review the petitioner's criminal history at a minimum of every 90 days until the end of the deferral period; and

(4) Report known violations of supervision or law and noncompliance with conditions of the deferred prosecution to the court within five business days or as soon as practicable.

[ 2024 c 306 s 25; 1991 c 247 s 2; 1985 c 352 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 306: See note following RCW 9.94A.661.

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.